Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Chapter 29. Drainage Districts with Local Commissioners

§ 51-29-1.
Scope of chapter.

This chapter shall govern the future operation of all drainage districts heretofore organized or now in process of organization under the provisions of Chapter 195 of the Laws of 1912 and amendments thereto, and such other districts as may hereafter be organized under the provisions of this chapter, or which may elect to come within its provisions in the manner herein provided.

All of the provisions of Chapters 31 and 33 of this title which are not contained in this chapter, and which do not conflict with any of the provisions of this chapter, shall apply to any districts organized or operating hereunder.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, §§ 4448, 4526; 1942, §§ 4674, 4752.

§ 51-29-3.
Definitions.

The words “real property”, whenever used in this chapter, shall have the same meaning as when used in the law providing for state and county revenues, and shall embrace all railroads within the district.

The word “ditch,” as used in this chapter, shall be held to include branch or lateral drains, tile drains, levees, sluiceways, water courses, floodgates, and any other construction work found necessary for the reclamation of wet and overflowed lands.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 4443, 4478; 1930, §§ 4461, 4499; 1942, §§ 4687, 4725; Laws, 1912, ch. 195.

§ 51-29-5.
Creation of drainage districts.

When one-fourth (1/4) or more of the owners of real property within a proposed drainage district shall file a petition in the chancery court of the county to establish a drainage district to embrace their property, describing generally the region which it is intended shall be embraced within the district, it shall be the duty of the chancery clerk to immediately publish a notice in a newspaper having a circulation in the proposed district for two (2) successive insertions, directed to the owners of the land to be embraced in the proposed district, giving notice of the said petition and designating a date, not less than ten (10) days after the last publication of notice, at which a hearing may be had on said petition. Upon the date designated in the notice, or upon a subsequent day to which the matter may be continued, the chancery court or the chancellor in vacation shall hear all objections, if any are offered, to the organization of said district, and unless at the hearing a majority of the landowners owning half or more of the land proposed to be included in the proposed district shall object to the organization, further proceedings shall be had as hereinafter provided; but if such a majority shall protest, the court or chancellor shall not proceed with the organization of said district. If in either event it be determined by the court or chancellor to proceed with the organization of the proposed district, the court or chancellor shall enter an order appointing as temporary commissioners three (3) landowners of the territory proposed to be drained, who shall take the oath required by Section 268 of Article 14 of the Constitution of the state and give bond in the penalty of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) payable to the county, and whose term of office shall expire upon the permanent organization of the district. Said temporary commissioners shall immediately organize and select a competent engineer, who shall give bond payable to the county in a sum of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), to be fixed by said commissioners for the faithful discharge of his duties, and who shall be liable upon such bond for negligence or incompetency causing loss to the county or district.

The engineer shall proceed forthwith to make a survey and ascertain the region which will be benefited by the proposed improvement, giving a general idea of its character and the cost of drainage, and making such suggestions as to the size of the drainage ditches and the location as he may deem advisable.

All expenses incident to the survey, legal expenses, and the cost of publication shall be paid by the county as the work progresses upon a proper showing; but all expenses incurred by the county shall be paid out of the proceeds of the first assessment levied under this chapter.

Said temporary commissioners may, by and with the consent of the court or chancellor, for the purpose of prosecuting the preliminary work, paying the expenses incident to the survey, attorney’s fees, legal expenses, costs of publication, and other necessary expenses, borrow money at a rate of interest not exceeding that allowed in Section 75-17-105, and issue negotiable notes, certificates or other evidences of indebtedness therefor signed by the said three (3) temporary commissioners and payable either within or without the state to the person or persons from whom such money is borrowed, or bearer, or bearer simply, as said commissioners may elect. The said temporary commissioners may also issue to the engineer, or other persons who do the said preliminary work, negotiable evidences of debt signed by the three (3) said temporary commissioners, bearing interest at a rate not to exceed that allowed in Section 75-17-105. None of the said evidences of indebtedness so issued shall run for more than two (2) years, they shall be non-taxable, and said commissioners may pledge all assessments on the land proposed to be drained for the payment of said evidences of indebtedness. Said evidences of indebtedness may be paid off either out of any general fund of the drainage district if organized, or out of the proceeds of the first assessments levied under this chapter; but in the event the said district is not organized after said indebtedness has been incurred, then the board of supervisors may levy an acreage or an ad valorem tax against the lands embraced in said proposed drainage district in the manner hereinafter provided.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, bonds referred to hereinabove may be issued pursuant to the supplemental powers and authorizations conferred by the provisions of the Registered Bond Act, being Sections 31-21-1 through 31-21-7.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4434; 1930, § 4449; 1942, § 4675; Laws, 1912, ch. 195; Laws, 1983, ch. 494, § 22; Laws, 1985, ch. 477, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1985).

§ 51-29-7.
Organization of district in two or more counties.

If land in more than one county is embraced in the proposed district, the application shall be addressed to the chancery court of any county of such district, and all proceedings shall be had in such chancery court. The chancery court, or the chancellor in vacation shall apportion all costs between the county or counties in proportion to the benefit assessed in each county, and such expenses as were incurred prior to the time when such assessment was made shall be apportioned between the counties in the proportion which the chancery court, or the chancellor in vacation, shall deem to be just and equitable. All notices, in that event, shall be published in newspapers having a bona fide circulation in each county in which the district embraces land. All such districts shall be numbered consecutively or else shall receive names selected by the chancery court or the chancellor in vacation.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4436; 1930, § 4451; 1942, § 4677; Laws, 1912, ch. 195; Laws, 1914, ch. 269; Laws, 1922, ch. 213.

§ 51-29-9.
Hearing on engineer’s report.

As soon as the engineer has completed his survey of the proposed drainage district, he shall make a report thereof to the said temporary commissioners, who shall file the same with the clerk of the chancery court. Upon the filing of the report of said engineer, the chancery court, or the chancellor in vacation, shall enter an order directing the clerk of the chancery court to give notice by publication for two weeks by two insertions in some newspaper published and having a general circulation in the county or counties in which the lands of the proposed district lie, calling upon all persons owning property within said district to appear before the chancery court, or chancellor in vacation, on the date and at the time and place fixed by said order, which date shall not be earlier than twenty days and not later than forty days after the first publication, to show cause in favor of or against the establishment of the district.

At the time named in said notice, the court or chancellor in vacation shall hear all property owners within the proposed drainage district who wish to appear and advocate or resist the establishment of the said district. Any petition of proponents or objectors, advocating or resisting the establishment of said district, shall be filed with the clerk of said court prior to the time designated for said hearing. If the court or chancellor in vacation deems it to the best interest of the owners of the real property within the said district that same shall become a drainage district under the terms of this chapter, he shall make an order establishing same as a drainage district, subject to all the terms and provisions of this chapter. Upon the organization of said drainage district, it shall, in its corporate name by its commissioners, henceforth have power to contract and be contracted with, to sue and be sued, to plead and be impleaded, and to do and perform in the name of such district all such acts and things for the accomplishment of the purpose for which it was organized.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 4435, 4436; 1930, § 4450; 1942, § 4676; Laws, 1912, ch. 195; Laws, 1914, ch. 269; Laws, 1922, ch. 213.

§ 51-29-11.
Presentation of petitions.

If upon the hearing provided for in Sections 51-29-5 through 51-29-9 a petition is presented to the chancery court, or the chancellor in vacation, signed by a majority of the landholders owning one third of the land, or by one third of the landholders owning a majority of the land, praying that the improvements be made, it shall be the duty of the court or chancellor to make the order establishing the district without further inquiry, if it appear that the establishment thereof be necessary for the promotion of public health and for agricultural purposes. However, if upon that day a petition signed by a majority of the landowners owning one third of the land, or by one third of the landowners owning a majority of the land, be presented praying that the improvements be not made, it shall be the duty of the court or chancellor to so order; but if no such petition is filed, it shall be the duty of the court or chancellor to investigate as provided in the aforesaid sections and to establish such drainage districts as he is of the opinion the establishment thereof will be to the advantage of the owners of real property therein, and is for the public benefit. The petition provided for therein may be signed by women, whether married or single, owning land in the proposed district; guardians may sign for their wards; and trustees, executors, and administrators may sign for the estates represented by them; and if the signature of any corporation thereto is attested by the corporate seal, the same shall be sufficient evidence of the assent of the corporation to said petition.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4438; 1930, § 4452; 1942, § 4678; Laws, 1912, ch. 195; Laws, 1914, ch. 269.

§ 51-29-13.
Order establishing district.

The order of the chancery court, or chancellor in vacation, establishing such drainage districts shall have the force of a judgment. Any owner of real property within the district may appeal from said judgment to the supreme court within twenty days after said order has been made; but if no appeal is taken within that time, such judgment shall be deemed conclusive and binding upon all real property within the boundaries of the district, and upon the owners thereof. Any owner of property in the district proposed to be organized may, within a like time and in a like manner, appeal from any order refusing to establish such district.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4438; 1930, § 4453; 1942, § 4679; Laws, 1912, ch. 195; Laws, 1914, ch. 269.

§ 51-29-15.
Commissioners appointed; vacancies; removal; quorum.

When the chancery court or chancellor in vacation has established such district, he shall appoint three (3) owners of real property within the district to act as commissioners; and such persons, when so appointed, and their successors in office shall constitute, and are hereby declared to be, a body politic and corporate by the name and style selected as mentioned in this chapter, by the court or chancellor. Each of these commissioners shall take the oath of office as required by Section 268, Article 14 of the Constitution of the state, and shall also swear that he will not, directly or indirectly, be interested in any contract made by the board of commissioners save and except insofar as he may be benefited as a landowner, in common with other landowners, by the work contracted for, and that he will well and truly assess all benefits resulting from said improvements, and all damages caused thereby. Any commissioner failing to take oath within thirty (30) days after his appointment and to give bond in the sum of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), to be fixed by the court or chancellor, shall be deemed to have declined to act as commissioner, and his place shall be filled by the court or chancellor. Provided, however, where revenue for a drainage district is less than one thousand dollars ($ 1,000.00) per year from taxes or other sources, the chancellor, in his discretion, may reduce the bond to any amount he may deem sufficient.

All vacancies on the board shall be filled by the chancery court, or the chancellor in vacation, of the county; but, if a majority in number of the owners of real property in the district shall petition for the appointment of particular persons as commissioners, it shall be the duty of the court or chancellor to appoint the persons so designated. In the same manner, the commissioners shall be appointed at the expiration of the term of said commissioners. A majority of the commissioners shall constitute a quorum. The chancery court, or chancellor in vacation, shall remove any member of the board of commissioners, on the petition of the majority of the owners of land in the district, who shall own a majority of the acreage therein.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 4440, 4442; 1930, §§ 4454, 4457; 1942, §§ 4680, 4683; Laws, 1912, ch. 195; Laws, 1918, ch. 159; Laws, 1977, ch. 362, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 1977).

§ 51-29-17.
Terms of office and compensation.

The commissioners appointed as aforesaid shall hold their offices, one (1) for two (2) years, one (1) for four (4) years, and one (1) for six (6) years, from the date of their appointment and until their successors are appointed and qualified. On the expiration of their terms of office, their successors shall be appointed in like manner for the term of six (6) years thereafter. They shall hold their meetings at any time and place in the county or counties in which any part of the district is situated, upon the call of the president.

The commissioners herein provided for shall receive per diem compensation as provided by Section 25-3-69, together with mileage as provided in Section 25-3-41 for the distance traveled from their homes to and from the place of meeting.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4464; Hemingway’s 1921 Supp., § 4441a; 1930, §§ 4456, 4483; 1942, §§ 4682, 4709; Laws, 1912, ch. 195; Laws, 1918, ch. 159; Laws, 1960, ch. 177; Laws, 1971, ch. 334, § 2; Laws, 1981, ch. 374, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 51-29-19.
Power and duties of commissioners.

The said commissioners may adopt a common seal of the drainage district and alter the same at pleasure. They may, from time to time, make such bylaws, rules, and regulations, and alter and change the same as they may deem proper, not inconsistent with this chapter and the laws of this state, for the purpose of carrying into effect the object of their incorporation. They shall elect a president from their own number and appoint such other officers, agents, and attorneys, and employ such persons as they may think necessary for the efficient management of their business, and remove them at pleasure. They may do all acts and things not inconsistent with this chapter and with the laws of the state, and proper to effect the purpose and objects of this chapter.

Upon their qualification, the board of commissioners shall prepare plans for the improvement within the district, as prayed for in the petition, and shall procure estimates from a competent engineer or engineers as to the cost thereof. For that purpose, the board of commissioners may employ such engineers and other agents as may be needful, such engineer to give bond in the sum of at least one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), payable to the drainage district and conditioned for the faithful performance of the duties required of the engineer, which bond shall be approved by the board of commissioners, or the president. Said board of commissioners may employ the services of an attorney or a firm of attorneys as may be needed in the prosecution of the work for which the drainage district is organized, may employ such other agents as may be needed, may purchase such material and supplies, and pay for such publications and printing necessary or incidental in the prosecution of the work. Said board of commissioners shall provide for reasonable compensation to the engineer or engineers, attorneys, and other agents, and for the cost of such material, supplies, publications, and printing, and the same shall be taken as a part of the costs of the improvements; or said board of commissioners may borrow money necessary to pay for the services of the engineer or engineers, attorneys, and other agents, and for the cost of such material, supplies, publications, and printing, at a rate of interest not exceeding six per cent, per annum, and may execute a note or notes or other evidences of indebtedness therefor and may renew the same as may be necessary, and the money borrowed for such purposes shall be taken as a part of the costs of the improvements.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 4441, 4442; 1930, §§ 4455, 4457; 1942, §§ 4681, 4683; Laws, 1912, ch. 195; Laws, 1918, ch. 159.

§ 51-29-21.
Content of plans.

Such plans and specifications shall show not merely the location, width, and depth of the ditches, but also the work to be done in removing obstructions from water courses, the building of pumping stations, dams, flumes, floodgates, fences to protect the district, and such levees as may be necessary to protect the land from overflow. Whenever federal financial or other assistance is furnished in connection with the planning or construction of the proposed improvements, such plans and specifications shall be detailed only to the extent required by the federal department or agency responsible for furnishing such assistance.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp., § 4442b; 1930, § 4458; 1942, § 4684; Laws, 1918, ch. 159; Laws, 1960, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 51-29-23.
Payment of costs for abandoned improvements.

If for any cause the improvements shall not be made, said costs shall be charged on the real property in the district, including railroads, if any, and shall be raised and paid by assessments in the manner hereinafter described; or, in the event said assessments are not made, or the improvements shall not be completed or the same be abandoned, for any cause, after such indebtedness is incurred, the board of supervisors of the county in which the drainage district is located shall levy an acreage tax, or an ad valorem tax, on the lands in said proposed district if the same has not been organized, or on the lands of the district if the same has been organized, the total collections from which shall be sufficient to pay such indebtedness. The board of supervisors may levy a sufficient tax in one year or may levy a succession of acreage taxes, or ad valorem taxes, over a period of years, not to exceed three years, to be determined by said board of supervisors. If an ad valorem tax be levied, the board of supervisors may use for that purpose the assessments of the land of the last assessment roll of the county in which said lands are situated. In case the lands in the proposed district lie in more than one county, then the chancellor aforesaid shall apportion said indebtedness between the several counties, and the boards of supervisors of the several counties shall thereupon levy such apportioned tax upon the lands of their counties respectively, according to the ruling of the said chancellor.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 4442a; 1930, § 4549; 1942, § 4685; Laws, 1918, ch. 159; Laws, 1966, ch. 229, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 8, 1966).

§ 51-29-25.
Costs for proceedings abandoned and afterwards resumed.

In any proceeding heretofore or hereafter had for the establishment of a ditch or drain or the doing of any other thing deemed necessary, when an engineer has been appointed and has made complete surveys and reports thereof, and for any reason the improvement has been abandoned and the proceedings dismissed, and afterwards proceedings are instituted for the establishment of a ditch or drain or for the doing of anything toward the prosecution of said work for the reclamation of the same territory surveyed in said former proceedings, or a part thereof and the territory additional thereto, the engineer’s reports, surveys, stakes, and monuments made in former proceedings, as far as practicable or so much thereof as may be applicable, and the cost thereof in said former proceedings, or such parts thereof as used, shall be paid for as a part of the subsequent proceedings in which such report, surveys, stakes, and monuments, or a part thereof, are used.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp., § 4442c; 1930, § 4460; 1942, § 4686; Laws, 1918, ch. 195.

§ 51-29-27.
Plans and estimates of commissioners to be filed.

As soon as said board of commissioners shall have formed its plan and shall ascertain the cost of improvement, it shall file the same with the clerk of the board of supervisors. Said plans shall be accompanied by a map showing the location of all the main and lateral ditches, and shall be accompanied by specifications describing the character of the improvements to be made, the width and depth of the ditches, the probable quantity of earth to be removed, all other work to be done, and the probable cost of draining said territory. Whenever federal financial or other assistance is furnished in connection with the planning or construction of the proposed improvements, such plans and specifications shall be detailed only to the extent required by the federal department or agency responsible for furnishing such assistance.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4444; 1930, § 4462; 1942, § 4688; Laws, 1912, ch. 195; Laws, 1914, ch. 269; Laws, 1960, ch. 201, § 2.

§ 51-29-29.
Preparation of assessment roll.

Said commissioners shall proceed to assess the land within the district and shall inscribe in a book the description of each tract of land, the benefit to accrue to each tract by reason of such improvement, and shall enter such assessments of benefits opposite the description, together with an estimate of what the landowner will probably have to pay on such assessment for the first year. The assessment shall embrace not merely the land, but all railroad and other improvements on lands which will be benefited by the drainage system. In preparing the description of the lands so assessed, the commissioners may use either (1) the descriptions of lands and subdivisions thereof as shown on the official United States Government surveys and plats of lands within the district; (2) the descriptions of lands and subdivisions thereof as shown upon any plat of lands within the district and recorded upon the land records of the county in which said lands are located; (3) any metes and bounds descriptions found in the latest filed conveyance of said lands and of record in the records of deeds of the county in which said lands are located, and in such case it shall be sufficient to describe said lands by stating the number of acres and the general location of the land within the section, together with the book and page numbers of said conveyance. They shall place opposite each tract of land the name of the supposed owner, as shown by the last county land assessment roll; but a mistake in the name shall not vitiate the assessment. If any landowner or private corporation or any other drainage district has dug ditches or made drainage work that can be profitably used as a part of the general proposed system, the value of such ditches or drainage work to the district shall be assessed by said commissioners and shall appear upon the assessment and be paid for by the district, either in cash or by reduction of assessment. The commissioners shall also assess and place upon said roll or book of assessment, opposite each tract of land, all damages that will accrue to any landowner by reason of the proposed improvement, including all injury to lands taken or damaged; and when said commissioners return no assessment of damages as to any tract of land, it shall be deemed a finding by them that no damages will be sustained. If the commissioners, at any time either before or after the organization of the district, find that other land not embraced within the boundaries of the district will be benefited by the proposed improvement or improvements already made, they shall assess the estimated benefit to such lands and shall specially report to the chancery court, or chancellor in vacation, the assessments which they have made on land beyond the boundaries of the district, as already established. It shall thereupon be the duty of the clerk of the chancery court to give notice by two (2) weekly insertions in a newspaper published in the county where such lands lie describing the additional lands which have been assessed; and the owners of real property so assessed shall be allowed not less than ten (10) days after the last publication of such notice in which to file with the clerk of the chancery court their protest against being so assessed, or included within the district. The chancery court, or chancellor in vacation, shall, at its next succeeding session after the time for filing of such protest shall have expired, investigate the question whether the lands beyond the boundaries of the district so assessed by the commissioners will in fact be benefited by the making of the improvement, and from its finding in that regard, either the property owner or the commissioners of the district may, within twenty (20) days appeal to the supreme court. If the finding is in favor of the commissioners, the limits of the district shall be extended so as to embrace any lands that may be benefited by the making of the improvement. When their assessment is completed, the commissioners shall subscribe such assessment and deposit it with the clerk of the chancery court where it shall be kept and preserved as a public record; provided that, for the purpose of providing funds with which to clean out, restore, repair and rehabilitate the whole or any part of the drainage system of such district or for the purpose of cooperating with the United States or any agency thereof in such works, there may be imposed a uniform assessment on each acre of unsubdivided land lying within the district, and a uniform assessment by lot on subdivided land lying within the district, and the records required in this chapter shall show the amount of the assessment in lieu of the amount of benefits to accrue to each tract. Taxes levied hereunder are hereby declared to be taxes for maintenance purposes and shall not diminish in any manner the amount of assessed benefits in any such district which is otherwise available for the payment of any outstanding bonds of such district.

The assessments provided for in this section may be made even though evidences of indebtedness have been issued or validated or both prior thereto, but the lien of the holders of any such indebtedness shall not be impaired thereby.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4445; 1930, § 4463; 1942, § 4689; Laws, 1912, ch. 195; Laws, 1914, ch. 269; Laws, 1964, ch. 208; Laws, 1973, ch. 348, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 332, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 392, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1995).

§ 51-29-31.
Notice of assessment to landowners.

Upon the filing of such assessment, the chancery court, or the chancellor in vacation, shall enter an order directing the clerk of the chancery court to give notice by publication for two (2) weeks by two (2) insertions in some newspaper published and having a general circulation in each of the counties within which the lands of the district may lie, stating that the owners of lands assessed for drainage purposes in said district, if they desire, may appear before the chancery court, or chancellor in vacation, on the date and time and place fixed by said order, which date shall be not less than ten (10) days after the last publication of said notice, and present complaints, if any they have, against the assessment of land in the district.

The clerk of the chancery court shall publish said notice as directed by said order. The said notice shall give description of the lands assessed in as large tracts as the description will permit and shall state that said lands have been assessed for drainage purposes in said district; that any owner of real property, or the improvements thereon, within the district who conceives himself to be aggrieved by the assessment of benefits or damages or deems that the assessment of other lands in the district is inadequate shall file his written complaint or objection, in specific terms, with the clerk of said court prior to the time designated for said hearing.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4445; 1930, § 4463; 1942, § 4689; Laws, 1912, ch. 195; Laws, 1914, ch. 269; Laws, 1964, ch. 208; Laws, 1973, ch. 348, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1973).

§ 51-29-33.
Approved roll to be final assessment.

At the time designated in said notice the court, or chancellor in vacation, shall consider said complaint or objection and enter its or his findings thereon, either confirming such assessment or increasing or diminishing the same; and its or his findings shall be final and have the force and effect of a judgment from which an appeal may be taken within twenty (20) days to the supreme court of the state either by the property owner or by the commissioners of the district.

The assessment roll so prepared and filed by the commissioners, when approved by the chancery court, or chancellor in vacation, shall stand as a final assessment of benefits and damages upon the lands of the said district and no new assessment roll shall be required unless, in the opinion of the commissioners, it becomes necessary to raise the assessment of benefits to such lands because of additional benefits to the lands other than these assessed or because it becomes absolutely necessary in order to raise funds to preserve and maintain the improvements of the district.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4445; 1930, § 4463; 1942, § 4689; Laws, 1912, ch. 195; Laws, 1914, ch. 269; Laws, 1964, ch. 208; Laws, 1973, ch. 348, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1973).

§ 51-29-35.
Condemnation proceedings.

Any property owner may accept the assessment of damages in his favor made by the commissioners, or acquiesce in their failure to assess damages in his favor, and shall be construed to have done so unless he gives to said commissioners, within thirty days after the assessment is filed, notice in writing that he demands assessment of his damages by jury. In such event the commissioners shall institute in the proper court in the proper county an action to condemn the lands that must be taken or damaged in making such improvements, which action shall be in accordance with the proceeding for the condemnation of property for public use provided in the chapter on eminent domain. Where condemnation proceedings are had as herein provided and an appeal is taken to the circuit court, the drainage commissioners may pay the amount awarded by the jury into the hands of the clerk of the circuit court, who shall hold the same to abide the decision of said appeal, and the drainage commissioners may proceed with the work of constructing the drain as laid out by them.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4446; 1930, § 4464; 1942, § 4690; Laws, 1912, ch. 195; Laws, 1914, ch. 269.

§ 51-29-37.
Employment of counsel.

The drainage commissioners may employ an attorney to assist in the formation and administration of the drainage district, and to represent the district in all matters of a legal nature, at a fixed or agreed compensation, subject to the confirmation of the chancery court or chancellor in vacation, who may decrease but not increase such compensation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4465; 1942, § 4691.

§ 51-29-39.
Appraisement by commissioners as alternate method to acquire land and damage compensation.

In lieu of the method provided in Sections 51-29-29 through 51-29-35 for acquiring land and making compensation for damages, the drainage commissioners may adopt the following method for acquiring lands and making compensation for damages, to wit:

The commissioners may, at any time after the organization of the district, appraise the value of any land taken or to be taken for the purposes of the proposed improvement, according to the plans of the district on file, and the damages resulting to the owners from such taking. The board may specify, in case of any property, the particular purpose for which and the extent to which easement is desired, and the assessment of property in such case shall represent only the damages resulting from the use so specified. They may make a complete appraisement of all such lands, taken or to be taken, at one time, or at any time make appraisements as it becomes necessary or desirable. When the commissioners have made their appraisement of lands taken, they shall certify to the same and file it with the clerk of the chancery court of the county in which the land lies. The court, or chancellor in vacation, shall enter an order designating the date, time, and place for the hearing of objections to such appraisement, either at a regular term of the court or in vacation. The clerk shall issue a summons directed to the sheriff of the county or counties of the state in which any landowner or other person interested may reside, commanding him to summon such owner or owners or interested persons to appear at the time and place named. If the owner of any land sought to be taken is an infant or person of unsound mind, the summons may be served on his guardian; and the guardian in such cases is authorized, subject to the approval of the chancellor in termtime or vacation, to sell and convey such property and dedicate it thus to the public use, or he may agree upon the damages and thereby bind the ward. If there is no guardian in such case, the chancellor in vacation may, on application of anyone in interest, appoint a guardian ad litem to represent such infant or person of unsound mind, whose acts and doings in the premises shall be valid and binding on the ward. The chancellor may require a bond of such guardian ad litem. The clerk of the court shall notify the guardian ad litem of his appointment and the amount of bond required, if any, by certified mail sent to the post office address of the guardian. If the owner of such land is a nonresident of the state or cannot be found, or if the owner is unknown, and this shall apply to any person interested, upon affidavit to that fact being made by the commissioners or by their agent or attorney, service of the summons may be delivered to any of his agents in charge of the land; or publication shall be made in the manner provided by law for publication for nonresident and unknown parties in chancery suits. If the land belongs to a deceased person whose estate is being administered, the summons may be served upon the executor or administrator, who shall, for all purposes of this chapter, be authorized to act for the owner, and shall be responsible on his bond accordingly. Such notice, when published, need only state that the hearing will be for the purpose of confirming the report of the commissioners as to the appraisement of land taken for the use of the district. The notice shall contain the names of the owners or persons interested in such land and their post office address, if known, and if unknown, that fact shall be so stated, and shall contain a list of the land, described by section numbers, belonging to such nonresident owners through which the ditches of the district are to run, or which such lands are to be taken for the uses of the district.

If any owner is not satisfied with the amount allowed by the commissioners for lands taken by reason of the construction of such proposed system according to the plans of the district, he shall file with the clerk of the court written objections, in specific terms, prior to the time designated for the hearing.

If no written objections are filed, a decree confirming the appraisement shall be rendered, and upon payment of the amount to the chancery clerk, the commissioners of the district may enter upon and take possession of the property and appropriate it to the public use of the district and the title of the property shall thereupon vest in the district. The clerk shall receipt upon the decree for the money paid, and the decree with the receipt thereon shall be recorded.

If written objections are filed prior to the time set for the hearing, the court or chancellor in vacation shall proceed to hear the objections filed, trying the cause or causes without the intervention of a jury.

No judgment by default shall be entered against an owner or person interested residing in this state unless it appears that he has been duly served with summons at least thirty (30) days before the return day, and no judgment by default shall be rendered against any nonresident or unknown person or persons interested unless proper publication has been made.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4447; 1930, § 4466; 1942, § 4692; Laws, 1912, ch. 195; Laws, 1914, ch. 271; Laws, 1964, ch. 210; Laws, 1999, ch. 510, § 1, eff from and after August 2, 1999 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).